Utah statutes.
61-1-18.1.   Technical experts and specialists -- Employment -- Contracts.

The director may employ or contract with technical experts and specialists including but not limited to certified public accountants, appraisers, engineers, and tax accountants to conduct or participate in any examination, audit, investigation or proceeding.



Enacted by Chapter 284, 1983 General Session

